California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) On or before November 1, 2007, and by November 1 of every third year thereafter, the commission in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission and local publicly owned electric utilities, in a public process that allows input from other stakeholders, shall develop a statewide estimate of all potentially achievable cost-effective electricity and natural gas efficiency savings and establish targets for statewide annual energy efficiency savings
 and demand reduction for the next 10-year period. The commission shall base its estimate at least in part on information developed pursuant to Sections 454.55, 454.56, 715, 9505, 9615, and 9615.5 of the Public Utilities Code. The commission shall, for each electrical corporation and each gas corporation, include in the integrated energy policy report, a comparison of the public utility’s annual targets established pursuant to Sections 454.55 and 454.56, and the public utility’s actual energy efficiency savings and demand reductions.

(c) (1) On or before November 1, 2017, the commission, in collaboration with the Public Utilities Commission and local publicly owned electric utilities, in a public process that allows input from other stakeholders, shall establish annual targets for statewide energy efficiency savings and
 demand reduction that will achieve a cumulative doubling of statewide energy efficiency savings in electricity and natural gas final end uses of retail customers by January 1, 2030. The commission shall base the targets on a doubling of the midcase estimate of additional achievable energy efficiency savings, as contained in the California Energy Demand Updated Forecast, 2015-2025, adopted by the commission, extended to 2030 using an average annual growth rate, and the targets adopted by local publicly owned electric utilities pursuant to Section 9505 of the Public Utilities Code, extended to 2030 using an average annual growth rate, to the extent doing so is cost effective, feasible, and will not adversely impact public health and safety.

(2) The commission may establish targets for the purposes of paragraph (1) that aggregate energy
 efficiency savings from both electricity and natural gas final end uses. Before establishing aggregate targets, the commission shall, in a public process that allows input from other stakeholders, adopt a methodology for aggregating electricity and natural gas final end-use energy efficiency savings in a consistent manner based on source of energy reduction and other relevant factors.

(3) In establishing the targets pursuant to paragraph (1), the commission shall assess the hourly and seasonal impact on statewide and local electricity demand.

(4) In assessing the feasibility and cost-effectiveness of energy efficiency savings for the purposes of paragraph (1), the commission and the Public Utilities Commission shall consider the results of energy efficiency potential
 studies that are not restricted by previous levels of utility energy efficiency savings.

(5) The energy efficiency savings and demand reduction reported for the purposes of achieving the targets established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be measured taking into consideration the overall reduction in normalized metered electricity and natural gas consumption where these measurement techniques are feasible and cost effective.

(d) The targets established in subdivision (c) may be achieved through energy efficiency savings and demand reduction resulting from a variety of programs that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Appliance and building energy efficiency standards developed and adopted pursuant to
 Section 25402.

(2) A comprehensive program to achieve greater energy efficiency savings in California’s existing residential and
 nonresidential building stock pursuant to Section 25943.

(3) Programs funded and authorized pursuant to the California Clean Energy Job Creation Act (Division 16.3 (commencing with Section 26200)).

(4) Programs funded by the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund established pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government Code.

(5) Programs funded and authorized pursuant to this division.

(6) Programs of electrical or gas corporations, or community choice aggregators, that provide financial
 incentives, rebates, technical assistance, and support to their customers to increase energy efficiency, authorized by the Public Utilities Commission.

(7) Programs of local publicly owned electric utilities that provide financial incentives, rebates, technical assistance, and support to their customers to increase energy efficiency pursuant to Section 385 of the Public Utilities Code.

(8) Programs of electrical or gas corporations, local publicly owned electric utilities, or community choice aggregators, that achieve energy
 efficiency savings through operational, behavioral, and retrocommissioning activities.

(9) Programs that save energy in final end uses by reducing distribution feeder service voltage, known as conservation voltage reduction.

(10) Programs that save energy in final end uses by using cleaner fuels to reduce greenhouse gas emissions as measured on a lifecycle basis from the provision of energy services.

(11) Property Assessed Clean Energy (PACE) programs.

(e) Beginning with the 2019 edition of the integrated energy policy report and every two years thereafter, the commission shall provide recommendations and an update on progress toward achieving a doubling
 of energy efficiency savings in electricity and natural gas final end uses of retail customers by January 1, 2030, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c). The commission shall also include with the recommendations and update both of the following:

(1) An assessment of the effect of energy efficiency savings on electricity demand statewide, in local service territories, and on an hourly and seasonal basis.

(2) Specific strategies for, and an update on, progress toward maximizing the contribution of energy efficiency savings in disadvantaged communities identified pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 547, Sec. 6.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25320.

(a) The commission shall manage a data collection system for obtaining information necessary to develop the policy reports and analyses required by Sections 25301 to 25307, inclusive, the energy shortage contingency planning efforts in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 25700), and to support other duties of the commission.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure that information needed to support the energy policy analysis developed by the commission is obtained from stakeholders in the most cost-effective and efficient manner.

(2) The commission is encouraged to do all of the following with respect to its data collection:

(A) Align the collection of data to be consistent with the schedule of the integrated energy policy report, to the extent practical.

(B) Eliminate unneeded and duplicative data submittals from stakeholders.

(C) Give full consideration to the potential burdens these data requests impose on the resources of the stakeholders whose information is being requested.

(b) The data collection system, adopted by regulation under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and managed by the commission shall:

(1) Include a timetable for the submission of this information, so that the integrated energy policy report required by Section 25302 can be completed in an accurate and timely manner. The
 commission is encouraged to align its timetable with the schedule of the integrated energy policy report, to the extent practical.

(2) Require a person to submit only information that is necessary to the development of the integrated energy policy report and analyses, and that the person can either be expected to acquire through their market activities, or possesses or controls. Information collected pursuant to this section shall relate to the functional role of each category of market participant in that industry and the consumers within that industry.

(3) To the extent it satisfies the information needs of the commission, rely on the use of estimates and proxies, to the maximum extent practicable, for some data elements using survey and research techniques, while for other information it shall obtain data from market participants using submissions consistent with their
 accounting records. In determining whether to rely on estimates or participant-provided data, the commission shall weigh the burden of compliance on industry participants and energy consumers against the benefit of participant-provided data for the public interest.

(4) To the extent it satisfies the information needs of the commission, rely on data, to the maximum extent practicable, that is reported to other government agencies or is otherwise available to the commission.

(c) Pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (b), the data collection system for electricity and natural gas shall enumerate specific requirements for each category of market participants, including, but not limited to, private market participants, energy service providers, energy service companies, natural gas marketers, electric utility and natural gas utility companies, independent generators, electric
 transmission entities, natural gas producers, natural gas pipeline operators, importers and exporters of electricity and natural gas, and specialized electric or natural gas system operators. The commission may also collect information about consumers’ natural gas and electricity use from their voluntary participation in surveys and other research techniques.

(d) Pursuant to the requirements of subdivision (b), the data collection system for nonpetroleum fuels and transportation technologies shall enumerate specific requirements for each category of market participant, including, but not limited to, fuel importers and exporters, fuel distributors and retailers, fuel pipeline operators, natural gas liquid producers, and transportation technology providers. The commission may also collect information about consumers’ nonpetroleum fuel and transportation technology use from their voluntary participation in surveys and other research
 techniques.

(e) The commission shall collect data for petroleum fuel pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 25350). The commission may also collect information about consumers’ petroleum fuel use from consumers’ participation in surveys and other research techniques.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 353, Sec. 13.   (AB 1533)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

25321.

In order to ensure timely and accurate compliance with the data collection system adopted under Section 25320, the commission may use any of the following enforcement measures:

(a) If any person fails to comply with an applicable provision of the data collection system, the commission shall notify the person. If, after five working days from being notified of the violation, the person continues to fail to comply, the person shall be subject to a civil penalty, to be imposed by the commission after a hearing that complies with constitutional requirements.

(1) The civil penalty shall not be less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each category of data the person did not provide and for each day the violation has existed and continues to exist.

(2) In the case of a person who willfully makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any record, report, plan, or other document filed with the commission, the civil penalty shall not be less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) per day applied to each day in the interval between the original due date and the date when corrected information is submitted.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “person” means, in addition to the definition contained in Section 25116, any responsible corporate officer.

(c) Enforcement measures for petroleum and other fuels shall be those contained in Section 25362.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 568, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25322.

(a) The data collection system managed pursuant to Section 25320 shall include the following requirements regarding the confidentiality of the information collected by the commission:

(1) Any person required to present information to the commission pursuant to this section may request that specific information be held in confidence. The commission shall grant the request in any of the following circumstances:

(A) The information is exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act, Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(B) The information satisfies the confidentiality requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 2501) of Chapter 7 of Division 2 of Title 20 of the California Code of Regulations, as those regulations existed on January 1, 2002.

(C) On the facts of the particular case, the public interest served by not disclosing the information clearly outweighs the public interest served by disclosure of the information.

(2) The commission may, by regulation, designate certain categories of information as confidential, which removes the obligation to request confidentiality for that information.

(3) Any confidential information pertinent to the responsibilities of the
 commission specified in this chapter that is obtained by another state agency, or the California Independent System Operator or its successor, shall be available to the commission and shall be treated in a confidential manner.

(4) Information presented to or developed by the commission and deemed confidential pursuant to this section shall be held in confidence by the commission. Confidential information shall be aggregated or masked to the extent necessary to ensure confidentiality if public disclosure of the specific information would result in an unfair competitive disadvantage to the person supplying the information.

(b) Requests for records of information shall be handled as follows:

(1) If the commission
 receives a written request to publicly disclose information that is being held in confidence pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), the commission shall provide the person making the request with written justification for the confidential designation and a description of the process to seek disclosure.

(2) If the commission receives a written request to publicly disclose a disaggregated or unmasked record of information designated as confidential under paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), notice of the request shall be provided to the person that submitted the record. Upon receipt of the notice, the person that submitted the record may, within five working days of receipt of the notice, provide a written justification of the claim of confidentiality.

(3) The commission or its designee shall rule on a request made pursuant to paragraph (2) on or before 20 working days after its receipt. The commission shall deny the request if the disclosure
 will result in an unfair competitive disadvantage to the person that submitted the information.

(4) If the commission grants the request pursuant to paragraph (3), it shall withhold disclosure for a reasonable amount of time, not to exceed 14 working days, to allow the submitter of the information to seek judicial review.

(c) No information submitted to the commission pursuant to this section is confidential if the person submitting the information has made it public.

(d) The commission shall establish, maintain, and use appropriate security practices and procedures to ensure that the information it has designated as confidential, or received with a confidential designation from another government agency,
 is protected against disclosure other than that authorized using the procedures in subdivision (b). The commission shall incorporate the following elements into its security practices and procedures:

(1) Commission employees shall sign a confidential data disclosure agreement providing for various remedies, including, but not limited to, fines and termination for wrongful disclosure of confidential information.

(2) Commission employees, or contract employees of the commission, shall only have access to confidential information when it is appropriate to their job assignments and if they have signed a nondisclosure agreement.

(3) Computer data systems that hold confidential information shall include sufficient
 security measures to protect the data from inadvertent or wrongful access by unauthorized commission employees and the public.

(e) Data collected by the commission on petroleum fuels in Section 25320 shall be subject to the confidentiality provisions of Sections 25364 to 25366, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 384.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

25323.

Nothing in this division shall authorize the commission in the performance of its analytical, planning, siting, or certification responsibilities to mandate a specified supply plan for any utility.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 568, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25324.

The commission, in consultation with the Public Utilities Commission, the California Independent System Operator, transmission owners, users, and consumers, shall adopt a strategic plan for the state’s electric transmission grid using existing resources. The strategic plan shall identify and recommend actions required to implement investments needed to ensure reliability, relieve congestion, and meet future growth in load and generation, including, but not limited to, renewable resources, energy efficiency, and other demand reduction measures. The plan shall be included in the integrated energy policy report adopted on November 1, 2005, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 25302.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 692, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

25326.

(a) The commission shall hold public hearings to identify impediments that limit procurement of biomethane in California, including, but not limited to, impediments to interconnection. The commission shall offer solutions to those impediments as part of the integrated energy policy report prepared pursuant to Section 25302.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “biomethane” means biogas that meets the standards adopted pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 25421 of the Health and Safety Code for injection into a common carrier pipeline.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 602, Sec. 4.   (AB 1900)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25327.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) There is insufficient information available to fully realize the potential of solar photovoltaic energy generation to serve low-income customers, including those in disadvantaged communities.

(2) There is insufficient understanding of the barriers to access for low-income customers to all forms of renewable energy being generated in the state.

(3) There is insufficient understanding of
 the barriers to access for low-income customers to energy efficiency investments.

(4) There is insufficient understanding of the barriers to access for low-income customers to zero-emission and near-zero-emission transportation options.

(b) On or before January 1, 2017, the commission, with input from relevant state agencies and the public, shall conduct and complete a study on both of the following: 

(1) Barriers to, and opportunities for, solar photovoltaic energy generation as well as barriers to, and opportunities for, access to other renewable energy by low-income customers.

(2) Barriers to contracting opportunities for local small businesses in
 disadvantaged communities.

(c) On or before January 1, 2017, the commission, with input from relevant state agencies and the public, shall develop and publish a study on barriers for low-income customers to energy efficiency and weatherization investments, including those in disadvantaged communities, as well as recommendations on how to increase access to energy efficiency and weatherization investments to low-income customers.

(d) On or before January 1, 2017, the State Air Resources Board, in consultation with the commission and with input from relevant state agencies and the public, shall develop
 and publish a study on barriers for low-income customers to zero-emission and near-zero-emission transportation options, including those in disadvantaged communities, as well as recommendations on how to increase access to zero-emission and near-zero-emission transportation options to low-income customers, including those in disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 547, Sec. 7.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25328.

(a) In order to achieve the state’s goal of reaching 100 percent zero-emission vehicles for new passenger vehicles sales by 2035 and for medium- and heavy-duty vehicles everywhere feasible by 2045, it is the intent of the Legislature to advance zero-emission infrastructure deployment.

(b) The commission, in collaboration with the State Air Resources Board, the Public Utilities Commission, and other relevant stakeholders, shall do both of the following:

 (1) Annually gather entities’ fleet data from state agencies that already collect fleet data, including, but not limited to, data collected by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to its zero-emission vehicle regulations, and vehicle registration data collected by the Department of Motor Vehicles, to the extent that such data is collected by state agencies at the time. The data collected from state agencies pursuant to this paragraph shall encompass fleet data for on-road and off-road vehicles in the medium- and heavy-duty sectors
 of only those entities that are subject to the regulations of the State Air Resources Board, and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following data:

(A) The total vehicle fleet or equipment size and composition, including each vehicle’s fuel type, including battery electric, plug-in hybrid, or fuel cell.

(B) The physical address of the fleet’s location.

(C) Information that would allow the electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility to estimate the total anticipated charging capacity at each fleet location.

(2) Enter into data sharing agreements with state agencies, as necessary, to facilitate the gathering of
 data pursuant to this section.

(c) The commission shall share the data gathered pursuant to subdivision (b) with electrical corporations and local publicly owned electric utilities to help inform electrical grid planning efforts.

(d) For data shared pursuant to subdivision (c), an electrical corporation or local publicly owned utility shall not disclose information protected pursuant to Sections 8380 and 8381 of the Public Utilities Code.

(e) For data shared pursuant to subdivision
 (c), an electrical corporation or local publicly owned utility shall not disclose the data to third parties for any purpose.

(f) The commission’s data collection pursuant to this section is not intended to create any new or duplicate reporting requirements on behalf of fleet operators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 354, Sec. 2.   (AB 2700)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.3. Designation of Transmission Corridors [25330. - 25341.]

25330.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Feasible” has the same meaning as in Section 21061.1.

(b) “High-voltage electric transmission line” means an electric transmission line with an operating capacity of at least 200 kilovolts, or that is under the operational control of the California Independent System Operator.

(c) “Transmission corridor zone” means the geographic area necessary to accommodate the construction and operation of one or more high-voltage electric transmission lines. A transmission corridor zone shall not be more than 1,500 feet in width unless required to accommodate existing land uses and land uses identified in local general or specific plans, or to avoid environmental constraints or mitigate potential environmental impacts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25331.

(a) The commission may designate a transmission corridor zone on its own motion or by application of a person who plans to construct a high-voltage electric transmission line within the state. The designation of a transmission corridor zone shall serve to identify a feasible corridor where one or more future high-voltage electric transmission lines can be built that are consistent with the state’s needs and objectives as set forth in the strategic plan adopted pursuant to Section 25324.

(b) A person planning to construct a high-voltage electric transmission line may submit to the commission an application to designate a proposed transmission corridor zone as being consistent with the strategic plan adopted pursuant to Section 25324. The application shall be in the form prescribed by the commission and shall be supported by any information that the commission may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25332.

The designation of a transmission corridor zone is subject to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)). The commission shall be the lead agency, as provided in Section 21165, for all transmission corridor zones proposed for designation pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25333.

(a) In developing a strategic plan pursuant to Section 25324 or considering an application for designation pursuant to this chapter, the commission shall confer with cities and counties, federal agencies, and California Native American tribes to identify appropriate areas within their jurisdictions that may be suitable for a transmission corridor zone. The commission shall, to the extent feasible, coordinate efforts to identify long-term transmission needs of the state with the land use plans of cities, counties, federal agencies, and California Native American tribes.

(b) The commission shall not designate a transmission corridor zone within the jurisdiction of a California Native American tribe without the approval of the California Native American tribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25334.

(a) Upon receipt of an application or upon its own motion for designation of a transmission corridor zone, the commission shall arrange for the publication of a summary of the application in a newspaper of general circulation in each county where the proposed transmission corridor zone would be located, and shall notify all property owners within, or adjacent to, the transmission corridor zone. The commission shall transmit a copy of the application for designation to all cities, counties, and state and federal agencies having an interest in the proposed transmission corridor zone. The commission shall publish the application for designation on its Internet Web site, and notify members of the public that the application is available on the commission’s Internet Web site.

(b) As soon as practicable after the receipt of an application or upon its own motion for designation of a transmission corridor zone, the commission shall notify cities, counties, state and federal agencies, and California Native American tribes in whose jurisdictions the proposed transmission corridor zone would be located regarding the proposed transmission corridor zone and the objectives of the most recent strategic plan for the state’s electric transmission grid. The commission’s notice shall solicit information from, and the commission shall confer with, all interested cities, counties, state and federal agencies, and California Native American tribes regarding their land use plans, existing land uses, and other factors in which they have expertise or interest with respect to the proposed transmission corridor zone. The commission shall provide any interested city, county, state or federal agency, California Native American tribe, or member of the public, including any property owner within the proposed transmission corridor zone, ample opportunity to participate in the commission’s review of a proposed transmission corridor zone.

(c) The commission shall request affected cities, counties, state and federal agencies, the Electricity Oversight Board, the Independent System Operator, interested California Native American tribes, and members of the public, including any property owner within the proposed transmission corridor zone, to provide comments on the suitability of the proposed transmission corridor zone with respect to environmental, public health and safety, land use, economic, and transmission-system impacts or other factors on which they may have expertise.

(d) The commission shall require a person who files an application for the designation of a transmission corridor zone to pay a fee sufficient to reimburse the commission for all costs associated with reviewing the application. If the commission initiates the designation of a transmission corridor zone on its own motion, the commission shall fix the surcharge imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 40016 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, at a level sufficient to cover the commission’s added costs.

(e) Upon receiving the commission’s request for review of a proposed transmission corridor zone, a city or county may request a fee pursuant to Section 25538 to cover for the actual and added costs of this review and the commission shall pay this amount to the city or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25335.

(a) Within 45 days of receipt of the application or motion for designation, the commission shall commence public informational hearings in the county or counties where the proposed transmission corridor zone would be located.

(b) The purpose of the hearings shall be to do all of the following:

(1) Provide information about the proposed transmission corridor zone so that the public and interested agencies have a clear understanding of what is being proposed.

(2) Explain the relationship of the proposed transmission corridor zone to the commission’s strategic plan for the state’s electric transmission grid, as set forth in the most recent integrated energy policy report adopted pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 25300).

(3) Receive initial comments about the proposed transmission corridor zone from the public and interested agencies.

(4) Solicit information on reasonable alternatives to the proposed transmission corridor zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25336.

(a) Within 155 days of the final informational hearing, the commission shall conduct a prehearing conference to determine the issues to be considered in hearings pursuant to this section, to identify the dates for the hearings, and to set forth filing dates for public comments and testimony from the parties and interested agencies. Within 15 days of the prehearing conference, the commission shall issue a hearing order setting forth the issues to be heard, the dates of the hearings, and the filing dates for comments and testimony.

(b) The commission shall conduct hearings pursuant to the hearing order. The purpose of the hearings shall be to receive information upon which the commission can make findings and conclusions pursuant to Section 25337.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25337.

After the conclusion of hearings conducted pursuant to Section 25336, and no later than 180 days after the date of certification of the environmental impact report prepared pursuant to Section 25332, the commission shall issue a proposed decision that contains its findings and conclusions regarding all of the following matters:

(a) Conformity of the proposed transmission corridor zone with the strategic plan adopted pursuant to Section 25324.

(b) Suitability of the proposed transmission corridor zone with respect to environmental, public health and safety, land use, economic, and transmission-system impacts.

(c) Mitigation measures and alternatives as may be needed to protect environmental quality, public health and safety, the state’s electric transmission grid, or any other relevant matter.

(d) Other factors that the commission considers relevant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25338.

As soon as practicable after the commission designates a transmission corridor zone, it shall post a copy of its decision on its Internet Web site, send a copy of its decision, including a description of the transmission corridor zone, to each affected city, county, state agency, and federal agency, and notify property owners within or adjacent to the corridor of the availability of the decision on the commission’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25339.

After the commission designates a transmission corridor zone, it shall identify that transmission corridor zone in its subsequent strategic plans adopted pursuant to Section 25324. The commission shall regularly review and revise its designated transmission corridor zones as necessary, but not less than once every 10 years. In revising designations of transmission corridor zones, the commission shall follow the procedures of this chapter. If, upon regular review or at any other time, the commission finds that a transmission corridor zone is no longer needed, the commission shall revise or repeal the designation and, as soon as practicable, notify the affected cities, counties, state and federal agencies, and property owners within, or adjacent to, the transmission corridor zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25340.

After receiving notice from the commission regarding the designation or revision of a transmission corridor zone within its jurisdiction, each city or county shall consider the designated transmission corridor zone when making a determination regarding a land use change within or adjacent to the transmission corridor zone that could affect its continuing viability to accommodate a transmission line planned within the transmission corridor zone. Nothing in this section shall preclude compatible uses within or adjacent to a designated transmission corridor zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25341.

(a) Within a designated transmission corridor zone, within 10 days of accepting as complete an application pursuant to Section 65943 of the Government Code for a development project that a city or county determines would threaten the potential to construct a high-voltage electric transmission line, the city or county shall notify the commission of the proposed development project. The notice shall include a copy of the application, and set a deadline that is not less than 60 days from the date of the notice for the commission to provide written comments to the city or county regarding the proposed development project.

(b) If the commission finds that the proposed development project would threaten the potential to construct a high-voltage electric transmission line within the designated transmission corridor zone, the commission shall provide written comments to the city or county. The commission may recommend revisions to, redesign of, or mitigation measures for the proposed development project that would eliminate or reduce the threat.

(c) The city or county shall consider the commission’s comments, if any, prior to acting on the proposed development project. If the commission objects to the proposed development project, the city or county shall provide a written response that shall address in detail why it did not accept the commission’s comments and recommendations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 638, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4.5. Petroleum Supply and Pricing [25350. - 25367.]

25350.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the petroleum industry is an essential element of the California economy and is therefore of vital importance to the health and welfare of all Californians.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that a complete and thorough understanding of the operations of the petroleum industry is required by state government at all times to enable it to respond to possible shortages, oversupplies, or other disruptions and to assess whether all consumers, including emergency service agencies, state and local government agencies, and agricultural and business consumers of petroleum products have adequate and economic supplies of fuel.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that information and data concerning all aspects of the petroleum industry, including, but not limited to, crude oil production, production and supplies of finished branded and unbranded gasoline, supplies of diesel fuel and other distillates, supplies of blendstocks used to make gasoline and other refined products, refining, product output, exports of finished gasoline, diesel fuel, and blendstocks, prices, distribution, demand, and investment choices and decisions are essential for the state to develop and administer energy policies that are in the interest of the state’s economy and the public’s well-being.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 288, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25352.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Petroleum Industry Information Reporting Act of 1980.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1055, Sec. 4.   Effective September 26, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

25354.

(a) Each refiner and major marketer shall submit information each month to the commission in such form and extent as the commission prescribes pursuant to this section. For purposes of this section, the term “refiner” and “refinery” shall include refiners and refineries as defined in Sections 25127 and 25128, and also those persons and facilities that process renewable feedstocks instead of crude oil feedstocks and otherwise meet the definitions in Sections 25127 and 25128. The information shall be submitted within 30 days after the end of each monthly reporting period and shall include the following:

(1) Refiners shall report, by volume, price, and type, for each of their refineries,